Vermont, session 2025-2026, H329.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 2151 is amended to read:
§ 2151. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abandoned motor vehicle” means:
(i) a motor vehicle that has remained on public or private property
or on or along a highway for more than 48 96 hours without the consent of the
owner or person in control of the property and has a valid registration plate or
public vehicle identification number that has not been removed, destroyed, or
altered; or
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 2 of 13
(ii) a motor vehicle that has remained on public or private property
or on or along a highway without the consent of the owner or person in control
of the property for any period of time if:
(I) the vehicle does not have a valid registration plate or the
public vehicle identification number has been removed, destroyed, or altered;
or
(II) a law enforcement officer has requested that the vehicle be
removed by a towing business.
(B) “Abandoned motor vehicle” does not include:
(i) a vehicle or other equipment used or to be used in construction
or in the operation or maintenance of highways or public utility facilities,
which is left in a manner that does not interfere with the normal movement of
traffic; or
(ii) a vehicle that is towed from a private tow-away zone.
* * *
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 2152 is amended to read:
§ 2152. AUTHORIZED REMOVAL OF ABANDONED MOTOR
VEHICLES
(a) Public property. A law enforcement officer is authorized to remove or
cause removal of an abandoned motor vehicle from public property, and may
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 3 of 13
contact a towing service for its removal, based upon personal observation by
the officer that the vehicle is an abandoned motor vehicle.
(b) Private property.
(1) A law enforcement officer is authorized to remove or cause removal
of an abandoned motor vehicle from private property, and may contact a
towing service for its removal, based upon the request of the landowner on
whose property the vehicle is located and information indicating that the
vehicle is an abandoned motor vehicle.
(2) A landowner of private property is authorized to remove or cause
removal of an abandoned motor vehicle from that property or to any other
place on any property of the landowner, and may contact a towing service for
its removal. A landowner who removes or causes removal of an abandoned
motor vehicle shall immediately notify the police agency in the jurisdiction
from which the vehicle is removed and provide the registration plate number,
the public vehicle identification number, if available, and the make, model, and
color of the vehicle. The landowner may remove the vehicle from the place
where it is discovered to any other place on any property owned by him or her
the landowner, or cause the vehicle to be removed by a towing service under
the provisions of this subsection, without incurring any civil liability to the
owner of the abandoned vehicle.
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 4 of 13
(c) Record of caller.
(1) If a towing service is summoned to tow an abandoned motor vehicle
by the landowner of private property, the towing service shall record the first
name, last name, and telephone number of the individual who summoned it to
the scene and the make, model, year, color, vehicle identification number
(VIN), and license plate number of the towed vehicle.
(2) If a towing company is summoned to tow an abandoned motor
vehicle by a law enforcement officer, the towing service shall record the
identity of the law enforcement officer and the log number, call number,
incident number, or dispatch number assigned to the incident as applicable.
(d) Visual documentation. Prior to towing a vehicle under this section, a
towing service shall take photographs, video, or other visual documentation to
evidence the location of the vehicle and any damages.
(e) Record retention and production.
(1) The towing service shall maintain a record of the information
described in subsections (c) and (d) of this section and shall retain that
information for three years from the date on which it tows the vehicle.
(2) The towing service shall make the records required to be maintained
under subdivision (1) of this subsection available within 48 hours after receipt
of a written request from law enforcement or the Department of Motor
Vehicles.
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 5 of 13
(f) Storage. The towing service shall properly secure all towed vehicles
and make all reasonable efforts to prevent further damage, weather damage, or
theft to all towed vehicles, including the vehicle’s cargo and contents.
(g) Recovery of personal items.
(1) The towing service shall promptly allow the vehicle owner, or with
the vehicle owner’s written authorization the vehicle owners’ spouse, child,
sibling, or parent, to recover the following personal items from a towed vehicle
prior to the payment of charges for the towing and storage of the vehicle:
(A) child restraint systems, as defined in 49 C.F.R. § 571.213, or
child booster seats;
(B) eyeglasses;
(C) food;
(D) medicine;
(E) personal medical and health care devices;
(F) hearing aids;
(G) perishable property;
(H) operator’s licenses or privilege cards;
(I) Social Security card or other identifying document;
(J) cash, credit cards, checks, or checkbooks;
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 6 of 13
(K) wallet, purse, or other item containing an operator’s license or
privilege card, cash, credit card, check, checkbook, Social Security card,
identifying document; and
(L) higher education textbooks and study materials.
(2) The towing service shall promptly allow an individual other than the
vehicle owner to recover any of the individual’s personal property from the
vehicle if the individual provides adequate proof that the property belongs to
the individual.
(h) Hearing on vehicle removal.
(1) A vehicle owner may file a petition in the Superior Court for the
county in which the owner resides or in which the owner’s motor vehicle is
located, to:
(A) contest whether the owner’s vehicle was an abandoned motor
vehicle at the time of its removal pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this
section;
(B) determine the reasonableness of any fees or charges assessed
pursuant to section 2155 of this subchapter;
(C) seek compensation for any damages to the owner’s vehicle or
damage to or loss of personal property in the vehicle; and
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 7 of 13
(D) seek relief from any charges or fees related to the towing or
storage of the vehicle that were assessed in violation of the provisions of
section 2155 of this subchapter.
(2) Notice of the hearing shall be provided to the towing service, the
municipality if the vehicle was removed from public property, the private
property owner if the vehicle was removed from private property, and any
known lienholder for the vehicle.
(3) The court may award relief as it determines to be appropriate to a
vehicle owner who prevails in an action brought under this subsection,
including:
(A) injunctive relief, including release of the vehicle or a reduction in
fees or charges assessed in relation to the removal, towing, or storage of the
vehicle;
(B) actual damages;
(C) costs and reasonable attorney’s fees; and
(D) other appropriate relief.
Sec. 3. 23 V.S.A. § 2154 is amended to read:
§ 2154. IDENTIFICATION AND RECLAMATION OF ABANDONED
MOTOR VEHICLES
(a) The Department shall make a reasonable attempt to locate and provide
notice to an owner of an abandoned motor vehicle.
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 8 of 13
(1)(A) If the abandoned motor vehicle is not identifiable by its
registration plates or public vehicle identification number, and if the
Department shall not more than 10 days after the date of the receipt of the
abandoned motor vehicle form publish a notice containing the following
information in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the
motor vehicle was abandoned:
(i) a description of the vehicle, including the color, year, make,
and model;
(ii) a statement that if the owner of the vehicle cannot be
determined within the time period established pursuant to subdivision (B) of
this subdivision (a)(1), the Commissioner will issue a certificate of abandoned
motor vehicle with an appropriate title or salvage title; and
(iii) information regarding how the towing service storing the
vehicle can be contacted to claim the vehicle.
(B) If no owner can be determined within 21 days after the date of
receipt of the abandoned motor vehicle certification form, the Commissioner
shall issue a certificate of abandoned motor vehicle with an appropriate title or
salvage title.
* * *
(3) The Department shall maintain and keep current on its website a list
of vehicles for which an application for a certificate of abandoned motor
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 9 of 13
vehicle has been filed and contact information for Department personnel to
whom evidence of ownership may be presented under subsection (b) of this
section. At a minimum, the list shall include the vehicle’s make; registration
plate number or public vehicle identification number, or both if available;
model; model year; and the name and contact information of the person who
applied for the certificate of abandoned motor vehicle.
(b) An owner or lienholder may reclaim an abandoned motor vehicle by
presenting to the Department satisfactory evidence of ownership, and paying or
reimbursing, or making arrangements to pay or reimburse, the towing agency,
the Department, or the landowner, as the case may be, any towing fee or
storage charges permitted under section 2155 of this title.
Sec. 4. 23 V.S.A. § 2155 is amended to read:
§ 2155. FEES AND CHARGES
(a) Towing fees. For towing an abandoned motor vehicle from private
property, a towing service may charge a reasonable fee that is not more than
$130.00 or $4.50 per mile towed, whichever is greater, to be paid by the
vehicle owner or the landowner of the private property.
(b) Storage charges. In addition to any towing fee, an owner or lienholder
reclaiming an abandoned motor vehicle may be charged and shall pay a fee for
the costs of storage of the vehicle that is not more than $35.00 per day, except
that no fee may be charged for storage for any period preceding the date upon
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 10 of 13
which the form for abandoned motor vehicle certification is sent to the
Department.
Sec. 5. ABANDONED MOTOR VEHICLES; WORKING GROUP;
REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Abandoned Motor Vehicle Working
Group to develop an equitable system for the disposal and sale of unclaimed,
abandoned motor vehicles.
(b) Membership. The Working Group shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Treasurer or designee;
(2) the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles of designee;
(3) the Attorney General or designee;
(4) a representative of municipal government designated by the Vermont
League of Cities and Towns;
(5) a representative of municipal law enforcement designated by the
Vermont Association of Chiefs of Police; and
(6) an individual designated by the Vermont Towing Association to
represent the interests of towing service operators.
(c) Powers and duties. The Working Group shall study the potential for
amending the process for the disposal or sale of unclaimed, abandoned motor
vehicles, including the following:
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 11 of 13
(1) the benefits and drawbacks of the current procedure set forth in
Vermont law for:
(A) the removal of abandoned motor vehicles;
(B) identification and location of the owner of an abandoned motor
vehicle;
(C) providing notice to the owner of an abandoned motor vehicle;
and
(D) disposal or sale of an abandoned motor vehicle if the vehicle’s
owner cannot be identified or located or if the vehicle is not claimed;
(2) potential changes to the Vermont statutes to improve the process of
identifying and locating the owner of an abandoned motor vehicle and
providing notice to that owner of the abandoned motor vehicle;
(3) a process for disposing of abandoned motor vehicles with sufficient
value through public auctions;
(4) potential options for the disposal of abandoned motor vehicles that
lack sufficient value to be sold at public auction;
(5) an equitable process for the distribution of any proceeds from the
sale of abandoned motor vehicles at auction, including:
(A) payment of charges and fees related to towing and storage of the
abandoned motor vehicle;
(B) satisfaction of any liens on the abandoned motor vehicle; and
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 12 of 13
(C) potential options for providing any remaining amounts to the
owner of the abandoned motor vehicle, including the potential for the
Unclaimed Property Division in the Office of the Treasurer to provide
assistance; and
(6) other potential uses for any proceeds from the sale of an abandoned
motor vehicle if the owner of the abandoned motor vehicle cannot be identified
or located.
(d) Assistance. The Working Group shall have the administrative,
technical, and legal assistance of the Office of the Treasurer and the technical
and legal assistance of the Department of Motor Vehicles.
(e) Report. On or before January 15, 2026, the Working Group shall
submit a written report to the House and Senate Committees on Transportation
with its findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Treasurer or designee shall call the first meeting of the Working
Group to occur on or before September 1, 2025.
(2) The Treasurer or designee shall be the chair.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Working Group shall cease to exist on February 15, 2026.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Working Group
who are not otherwise compensated for their attendance at meetings shall be
VT LEG #380255 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.329
2025 Page 13 of 13
entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted
under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than four meetings. These payments
shall be made from monies appropriated to the Office of the Treasurer.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 5 shall take effect on passage.
(b) The remaining sections shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380255 v.2